Maryland, session 2025, HB0416.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
21–701.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0416*

HOUSE BILL 416
(3) “County tax limitation” means a provision of a county charter that
limits:
(i) the maximum property tax rate that a county may impose; or
(ii) the rate of growth of county property tax revenues.
Article – Tax – Property
6–302.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section and after complying with § 6–305
of this subtitle, in each year after the date of finality and before the following July 1, the
Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of each county annually
shall set the tax rate for the next taxable year on all assessments of property subject to that
county’s property tax.
(b) (1) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section and §§ 6–305 and
6–306 of this subtitle:
(i) there shall be a single county property tax rate for all real
property subject to county property tax except for operating real property described in §
8–109(c) of this article; and
(ii) the county tax rate applicable to personal property and the
operating real property described in § 8–109(c) of this article shall be no more than 2.5
times the rate for real property.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection does not affect a special rate prevailing
in a taxing district or part of a county.
(c) (1) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of
a county may set a special rate for a vacant lot or improved property cited as vacant and
unfit for habitation or other authorized use on a housing or building violation notice.
(2) (I) IN THIS PARAGRAPH, “COUNTY TAX LIMITATION” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 21–701 OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(II) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY IN PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY.
(III) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A
COUNTY TAX LIMITATION DOES NOT APPLY TO A PROPERTY TAX RATE SET BY THE
GOVERNING BODY OF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY IN THE EXERCISE OF THE
AUTHORITY GRANTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.

HOUSE BILL 416 3
(3) On or before December 1 each year, the Mayor and City Council of
Baltimore City or the governing body of a county that enacts a special rate under paragraph
(1) of this subsection shall report to the Department of Housing and Community
Development and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the
General Assembly on:
(i) the special rate set under paragraph (1) of this subsection;
(ii) the number of properties to which the special rate applies;
(iii) the revenue change resulting from the special rate;
(iv) the use of the revenue from the special rate; and
(v) whether properties subject to the special rate are viable for
adaptive reuse, as defined in § 1–102 of the Housing and Community Development Article,
and plans to convert viable properties.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.